Washington statutes.
RCW 18.51.400

Receivership—Legislative findings.

The legislature finds that the closure of a nursing home can have devastating effects on residents and, under certain circumstances, courts should consider placing nursing homes in receivership. As receivership has long existed as a remedy to preserve assets subject to litigation and to reorganize troubled affairs, the legislature finds that receivership is to be used to correct problems associated with either the disregard of residents' health, safety, or welfare or with the possible closure of the nursing home for any reason.

[ 1987 c 476 s 9.]